District of Columbia statutes.
4-805

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-193, § 6, 32 DCR 1010
1981 Ed., § 3-705.